tr: Afiş tasarımı: Çelenk; Harfler; Şekiller; Püskül; Diğer
da: Bannerdesign: Krans; Bogstaver; Former; Kvast; Andet
lt-LT: Juostų dizainas: Girlianda; Raidės; Formos; Kutai; Kita
cs: Design banneru: Girlanda; Dopisy; Tvary; Střapec; Jiné
vi: Thiết kế biểu ngữ: Dây trang trí; Chữ cái; Hình dạng; Núm tua; Khác
de: Design des Banners: Girlande; Briefe; Formen; Quaste; Sonstiges
ko: 배너 디자인: 화환; 글자; 모양; 태슬; 기타
en: Banner design: Garland; Letters; Shapes; Tassel; Other
ru: Тип растяжки: Гирлянда; Буквы; Формы; Кисточки; Другое
hr-HR: Dizajn zastavica: Girlanda; Slova; Oblici; Kićanka; Ostalo
nl: Bannerontwerp: Garland; Letters; Vormen; Kwast; Andere
th: การออกแบบแบนเนอร์: มาลัยดอกไม้; จดหมาย; รูปร่าง; พู่; อื่นๆ
nb: Bannerdesign: Garland; Bokstaver; Former; Dusk; Annet
sk-SK: Dizajn bannera: Girlanda; Listy; Tvary; Strapec; Iné
ro-RO: Design banner: Ghirlandă; Litere; Forme; Ciucure; Altele
fi: Mainosjulisteen suunnittelu: Seppele; Kirjaimet; Muodot; Tupsu; Muu
pt-BR: Formato do banner: Festivo; Letras; Formas; Borla; Outro
pt-PT: Design da faixa: Grinalda; Cartas; Formas; Borla; Outro
it: Design dello striscione: Ghirlanda; Lettere; Forme; Fiocco; Altro
ja: バナーの種類: 花輪; 文字; 形状; タッセル; その他
fr: Conception de la bannière: Guirlande; Lettres; Formes; Gland; Autre
zh-CN: 横幅设计: 花环; 字母; 形状; 流苏; 其他
sl-SI: Zasnova traku: Girlanda; Črke; Oblike; Resice; Drugo
el: Σχεδίαση διακοσμητικών πανό: Γιρλάντα; Γράμματα; Σχήματα; Θύσανος; Άλλο
pl: Projekt banera: Girlanda; Litery; Kształty; Chwast; Inne
hu: Banner kialakítása: Girland; Betűk; Alakzatok; Rojt; Egyéb
bg-BG: Дизайн на банер: Гирлянд; Букви; Форми; Пискюл; Други
zh-TW: 橫幅設計: 花環; 信件; 形狀; 流蘇; 其他
sv: Bannerdesign: Krans; Brev; Former; Tofs; Övrigt
es: Diseño de la pancarta: Guirnalda; Letras; Formas; Borla; Otros